dev/redux/apertium-mal.mal.twol
Alphabet

 അ ആ ഇ ഈ ഉ ഊ ഋ ഌ എ ഏ ഐ ഒ ഓ ഔ ക ഖ ഗ ഘ ങ ച ഛ ജ ഝ ഞ ട 
 ഠ ഡ ഢ ണ ത ഥ ദ ധ ന ഩ പ ഫ ബ ഭ മ യ ര റ ല ള ഴ വ  ശ ഷ സ ഹ  

 ാ ി ീ  ു ൂ ൃ ൄ െ േ ൈ ൊ ോ ൌ ് ൎ ം ഃ  ൗ

‍ ‌

‍%{യ%}:0
‍%{അ%}:0

%>:0
%»:0 ; 

Sets 

FullVowel = എ  ഇ  ഉ  ആ ഓ ;
DepVowel = െ ി  ു ; 
ThalSwara = ാ ി ീ  െ േ ൈ ;
OshtSwara = ു ൂ ൊ ോ ൌ ൗ ;
Kharam = ക ച ട ത പ  ;
AthiKharam = ഖ ഛ ഠ ഥ ഫ ;
! ര ല വ ശ ഷ സ ഹ ള ഴ റ ണ ;
Mrithu = ഗ ജ ഡ ദ ബ ;
Khosham = ഘ ഝ ഢ ധ ഭ;
Anunasiaka = ങ ഞ ണ ന മ ;
!Dridam= ക ച ട ത പ ഖ ഛ ഠ ഥ ഫ ;
Dridam = ക ച ട ത പ  ഖ ഛ ഠ ഥ ഫ ഗ ജ ഡ ദ ബ ഘ ഝ ഢ ധ ഭ ശ ഷ സ ;
Madhyamam = യ ര ല വ ;



Rules 
! Sandhi rules


"Remove 'anusuvara' when followed by a word boundary"
ം:0 <=> _ %»: ;
    except 
        _ %»: :DepVowel ; 

"Convert 'anusuvara' to letter മ  'm' when followed by dependent vowel"
ം:മ <=> _ %»: :DepVowel ; 

"Change free vowels to combining vowels after word boundary"
Vx:Vy <=> %»: (:0) _ ; 
                         %»: [ %{യ%}:യ | %{യ%}:വ ] _ ;  
    where Vx in ( എ  ഇ  ഉ    ആ   ഓ  )
          Vy in ( െ ി  ു   ാ  ോ ) matched ; 

"Delete 'virama' before word boundary"
്:0 <=> _ (‍:0) %»: ; 

"Remove zero-width joiner, \u200d when followed by a word boundary"
‍:0 <=> _  [ %>: | %»: ]  ;


"Surfacing of {യ} as യ and വ"
%{യ%}:Cx <=> Cy: %»: _ FullVowel: ;
         where Cy in ( ാ  ി  ീ  െ  േ  ൈ  ു  ൂ  ൊ  ോ  ൌ  ൗ ) 
               Cx in ( യ   യ  യ   യ    യ     യ    വ   വ     വ       വ      വ      വ   ) matched ;

!"Double the Dridam when it followed by {അ}"
!11%{അ%}:Ax <=> Ay: %»: _ Dridam: ;
!          where Ay in ( ക്ക ച്ച ട്ട ത്ത പ്പ  ഖ്ഖ  ച്ഛ   ഠ ഥ ഫ്ഫ  ഗ്ഗ ജ്ജ ഡ്ഡ ദ്ദ ബ്ബ ഘ്ഘ ഝ ഢ ധ്ധ ഭ്ഭ  ശ്ശ ഷ്ഷ  സ്സ ) 
!              Ax in (  ക ച ട ത പ  ഖ ഛ ഠ ഥ ഫ ഗ ജ ഡ ദ ബ ഘ ഝ ഢ ധ ഭ ശ ഷ സ  ) matched ;
